Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 1. Horse Industry Board.

§ 3.2-1700.
Horse Industry Board; composition and appointment of members; quorum.

The Horse Industry Board, established by the passage of a referendum held pursuant to Chapters 790 and 805 of the Acts of Assembly of 1993, is continued within the Department. The Horse Industry Board shall consist of 12 members representing the horse industry, industry support services, education, and equine health. Four members shall be the presidents of the following industry organizations: the Virginia Horse Council, Inc., the Virginia Thoroughbred Association, the Virginia Horse Shows Association, and the Virginia Quarter Horse Association. Four members shall serve at large, to be appointed by the Governor from nominations made by the remaining statewide horse breed or use organizations. The Governor shall also appoint two members from recommendations submitted by the Virginia horse industry: one shall be a representative of the horse industry support services or professional community (feed manufacturing or sales, pharmaceutical sales, horseshoeing, marketing, veterinary services, etc.) and the other shall be an individual commercially involved in the horse industry (manager, trainer, etc.). Each organization shall submit nominations or recommendations for each available position. If the organizations fail to provide the nominations, the Governor may appoint other nominees that meet the foregoing criteria.

An extension equine specialist from Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University shall serve as a voting member of the Horse Industry Board. The Commissioner shall serve as a nonvoting member.

Seven members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The presidents of the Virginia Horse Council, Inc., the Virginia Thoroughbred Association, the Virginia Horse Shows Association, and the Virginia Quarter Horse Association may each designate in writing a member of his organization as an alternate who may attend meetings in his place and be counted as a member of the Horse Industry Board for the purposes of a quorum and for voting.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.54; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 691, 714; 2016, c. 565.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 691 and 714, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act providing for (i) staggered terms for board, council, or commission members and (ii) two-year terms for chairmen appointed by the Governor shall not affect current members or chairmen whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2011.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 691 and 714 are identical, and added the last two sentences of the first paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 565 substituted “Acts of Assembly of 1993” for “1993 Acts of Assembly” in the first sentence, deleted “two or more” following “organization shall submit” and “at least 90 days before the expiration of the member’s term for which the nomination or recommendation is being provided” at the end of the next-to-last sentence and deleted “at least 90 days before the expiration date pursuant to this section” following “provide the nominations” in the first paragraph; and substituted “An extension equine” for “The extension horse” in the second paragraph.

§ 3.2-1701.
Horse Industry Board membership terms.

The terms for appointments to the Horse Industry Board shall be for four years, with no at-large member serving more than two consecutive terms.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.55; 2008, c. 860; 2022, cc. 576, 577.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, cc. 576 and 577, cl. 2 provides: “That, beginning July 1, 2022, the term of any member appointed to the Horse Industry Board pursuant to §

3.2-1701

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, that is set to expire on June 20 shall be extended to June 30 of that year. Thereafter, all appointments shall be for terms of four years.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 576 and 577 are identical, and substituted “four” for “three.”

§ 3.2-1702.
Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 565, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

3.2-1702

, relating to the Horse Industry Board officers and their compensation, was derived from Acts 2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.56; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1703.
Powers and duties of Horse Industry Board.

The Horse Industry Board shall be responsible for the promotion and economic development of the equine industry in the Commonwealth. To accomplish this function the Horse Industry Board is authorized to:

Produce economic reports;

Develop a horse industry directory;

Provide funding for educational programs;

Provide funding for research;

Engage in media liaison;

Collect and analyze data on the horse industry;

Disseminate industry-related data; and

Enter into contracts and agreements to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

The chairman of the Horse Industry Board shall make an annual report to the Horse Industry Board including a statement of the total receipts and disbursements for the year and shall file a copy of such report with the Commissioner.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.57; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1704.
Virginia Horse Industry Promotion and Development Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Horse Industry Promotion and Development Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All assessments collected pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert or be transferred to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall audit all the accounts of the Horse Industry Board as provided in § 30-133.

Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the Horse Industry Board on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by a duly authorized officer of the Horse Industry Board.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.58; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1705.
Management of referenda; Commissioner’s duties; notice.

The Commissioner shall arrange for and manage any referendum conducted under this chapter.

The Commissioner shall, at least 60 days before the date upon which a referendum is to be held, mail notice to the clerk of the circuit court in each locality where those eligible to vote in the referendum reside. The clerk of the circuit court shall post the notice and regulations on the front door or public bulletin board of the courthouse and certify the posting to the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall give general notice of the referendum in a newspaper of general circulation in Richmond, Virginia, and shall send a notice of the referendum to a newspaper of general circulation for each area where members of the horse industry reside, at least 60 days prior to the holding of any referendum under this chapter.The notice shall contain: (i) the date, hours, polling place, and method of voting in such referendum; (ii) the amount of assessment to be collected, means by which such assessment shall be collected, and general purposes for which the assessments will be used; and (iii) the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to §

3.2-112

.

The Commissioner shall prepare and distribute in advance of such referendum all necessary ballots, certificates, and supplies required for such referendum and shall, under regulations adopted by the Board, arrange for the use of polling places, if necessary.

The Commissioner shall, within 10 days after the referendum, canvass and publicly declare the results thereof and certify the same to the Governor and the Board.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.60; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1706.
Commissioner to maintain referenda results.

The Commissioner shall maintain records of the number of eligible persons who voted in any referendum authorized under this chapter.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.61; 2008, c. 860.